Maryland, session 2025, HB1118.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
3–401.
(a) The Carroll County Board consists of:
(1) Five voting members;
(2) Subject to subsection (f) of this section, one nonvoting student
representative; and
(3) The County Commissioners, who are nonvoting ex officio members.
(b) A candidate elected to the county board shall be a resident and registered
voter of Carroll County. Any member who no longer resides in Carroll County may not
continue as a member of the board.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1118*

HOUSE BILL 1118
(c) (1) Voting members of the Carroll County Board shall be elected as follows:
(i) Two members of the board shall be elected in the November
general election of 1994 and every 4 years thereafter;
(ii) Two members of the county board shall be elected in the
November general election of 1996 and every 4 years thereafter; and
(iii) One member of the county board shall be elected in the
November general election of 1998 and every 4 years thereafter.
(2) Voting members of the county board shall be elected:
(i) At a general election as required by this section; and
(ii) On a general countywide ticket.
(d) (1) Each voting member serves for a term of 4 years beginning the first
Monday in December immediately following the voting member’s election and until a
successor is elected and qualifies. The terms of the voting members are staggered as
required for the elections to the county board in subsection (c)(1) of this section.
(2) A voting member may not serve for more than two consecutive terms.
[(3) The Governor shall appoint a new voting member to fill any vacancy on
the board for the remainder of that term and until a successor is elected and qualifies.]
(3) (I) IF THERE IS A VACANCY OF A VOTING MEMBER OF THE
COUNTY BOARD OCCURRING 30 DAYS OR LESS BEFORE THE CANDIDATE FILING
DEADLINE FOR THE PRIMARY ELECTION THAT IS HELD IN THE SECOND YEAR OF THE
VACATING MEMBER’S TERM, THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS SHALL APPOINT A
QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL TO FILL THE VACANCY ON THE COUNTY BOARD FOR THE
REMAINDER OF THE TERM AND UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS ELECTED AND QUALIFIES.
(II) IF THERE IS A VACANCY OF A VOTING MEMBER OF THE
COUNTY BOARD OCCURRING 31 DAYS OR MORE BEFORE THE CANDIDATE FILING
DEADLINE FOR THE PRIMARY ELECTION THAT IS HELD IN THE SECOND YEAR OF THE
VACATING MEMBER’S TERM:
1. THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS SHALL APPOINT A
QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL TO FILL THE VACANCY ON THE COUNTY BOARD UNTIL A
MEMBER IS ELECTED AND QUALIFIES UNDER ITEM 2 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH; AND

HOUSE BILL 1118 3
2. AN INDIVIDUAL SHALL BE ELECTED AT THE NEXT
GENERAL ELECTION TO FILL THE VACANCY ON THE COUNTY BOARD FOR THE
REMAINDER OF THE TERM AND UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS ELECTED AND QUALIFIES.
(4) A voting member of the county board as of October 1, 1993, and any
voting member appointed to fill a vacancy in an unexpired term of such member, shall hold
office during his term and until a successor is elected and qualifies.
(e) (1) The State Board may remove a voting member of the county board for:
(i) Immorality;
(ii) Misconduct in office;
(iii) Incompetency; or
(iv) Willful neglect of duty.
(2) Before removing a voting member, the State Board shall send the
member a copy of the charges against him and give him an opportunity within 10 days to
request a hearing.
(3) If the voting member requests a hearing within the 10–day period:
(i) The State Board promptly shall hold a hearing, but a hearing
may not be set within 10 days after the State Board sends the member a notice of the
hearing; and
(ii) The voting member shall have an opportunity to be heard
publicly before the State Board in his own defense, in person or by counsel.
(4) A voting member removed under this subsection has the right to a de
novo review of the removal by the Circuit Court for Carroll County.
(f) (1) The student representative shall:
(i) Be an eleventh or twelfth grade student in the Carroll County
public school system elected by the high school students of the county in accordance with
procedures established by the school system;
(ii) Be a student government association representative at the
student’s high school;
(iii) Serve for 1 year beginning on July 1 after the election of the
student representative; and

HOUSE BILL 1118
(iv) Advise the county board on the thoughts and feelings of students
in Carroll County public schools.
(2) Unless invited to attend by an affirmative vote of a majority of the
county board, the student representative may not attend an executive session of the county
board.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.